Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-263
Violations; standing to sue.

Any person in this state, including any law enforcement official, who has cause to believe that (1) any licensed organization, (2) any lessor of facilities or bingo equipment and supplies used for a bingo occasion, (3) any person conducting any game of bingo, (4) any employee or agent of such licensed organization, lessor, or person, or (5) any person acting in concert with such licensed organization, lessor, or person has engaged in or is engaging in any conduct in violation of the Nebraska Bingo Act or has aided or is aiding another in any conduct in violation of such act may commence a civil action in any district court of this state.

Laws 1978, LB 351, § 49;

Laws 1979, LB 164, § 14;

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 33;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 45;

R.S.Supp.,1984, § 9-172;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 64.